test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_soohad_nongradable_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - šoohâd: # MLO, ok; A_AARRAN
    šoohâd+A+Attr: [šohâdis, šohâdâs]
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Nom: šoohâd
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Gen: šoohâd
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Acc: šoohâd
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Ill: šohâdân
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Loc: šohâdist
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Com: šohâdáin
    šoohâd+A+Sg+Abe: šoohâdttáá
    šoohâd+A+Ess: šohâdin
    šoohâd+A+Par: šohâdid
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Nom: šohâdeh
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Gen: šohâdij
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Acc: šohâdijd
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Ill: šohâdáid
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Loc: šohâdijn
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Com: [šohâdijguin, šohâdijgijn]
    šoohâd+A+Pl+Abe: šohâdijttáá
